Utah statutes.
34A-4-101.   Who entitled.

(1)  Certain disabled miners meeting the requirements of Section 34A-4-102 shall be entitled to, and shall receive, the free hospital and medical service provided for in this chapter.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), in the event occupational diseases are made compensable under Chapter 2 or 3, no employer or insurance carrier shall be permitted to evade payment under Chapter 2 or 3 by compelling a disabled miner to avail himself of the benefits provided for in this chapter.

